Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.270

Escrow moneys may be used for legal representation.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of *this act the department shall make payments from an escrow account to any person accused or convicted of a crime upon the order of a court of competent jurisdiction after a showing by such person that such moneys shall be used for the exclusive purpose of retaining legal representation at any stage of the proceedings against such person, including the appeals process.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 219 s 19.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: "this act," see note following RCW 7.68.250.

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 219: See note following RCW 70.125.010.